New Jersey, session 221, A5074.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  N.J.S.18A:66-53.2 is amended to read as follows: 18A:66-53.2.  a. Except as provided in subsection b. of this section, if a former member of the retirement system who has been granted a retirement allowance for any cause other than disability, becomes employed again in a position which makes him eligible to be a member of the retirement system, his retirement allowance and the right to any death benefit as a result of his former membership, shall be canceled until he again retires. Such person shall be reenrolled in the retirement system and shall contribute thereto at a rate based on his age at the time of reenrollment. Such person shall be treated as an active member for determining disability or death benefits while in service and no benefits pursuant to an optional selection with respect to his former membership shall be paid if his death shall occur during the period of such reenrollment. Upon subsequent retirement of such member, his former retirement allowance shall be reinstated together with any optional selection, based on his former membership.  In addition, he shall receive an additional retirement allowance based on his subsequent service as a member computed in accordance with applicable provisions of this article; provided, however, that his total retirement allowance upon such subsequent retirement shall not be a greater proportion of his final compensation than the proportion to which he would have been entitled had he remained in service during the period of his prior retirement.  Any death benefit to which such member shall be eligible shall be based on his latest retirement, but shall not be less than the death benefit that was applicable to his former retirement. b.    The cancellation, reenrollment, and additional retirement allowance provisions of subsection a. of this section shall not apply to a former member of the retirement system who is a certificated superintendent or a certificated administrator and who, after having been granted a retirement allowance, becomes employed by the State Department of Education in a position of critical need as determined by the State Commissioner of Education, or becomes employed by a board of education as a certificated superintendent or a certificated administrator, or who is a certified school nurse and who, after having been granted a retirement allowance, becomes employed by a board of education as a certified school nurse, on a contractual basis for a term of not more than one year; except that the cancellation, reenrollment, and additional retirement allowance provisions shall apply if the former member becomes employed within 120 days of retirement, or if the former member becomes employed as a certified school nurse within 180 days of retirement, with the employer from which the member retired.  Nothing herein shall preclude a former member so reemployed with a board of education from renewing a contract [for one additional] every year; provided that [the total period of employment with any individual board of education does not exceed a two-year period, unless so approved by the Commissioner of Education as being in the best interests of the school district; and provided that] no such renewal shall provide the former member an election regarding whether or not to be reenrolled.  A retired certificated superintendent, administrator, or certified school nurse employed or reemployed pursuant to this subsection shall not obtain tenure in the position and any tenure or seniority rights previously obtained shall not apply to the period of employment or reemployment.  This subsection shall be effective if the qualified status of the retirement system under federal law can be maintained upon its application, and such modifications to the system as may be available shall be made to allow for its application. c.     A former member of the retirement system who has been granted a retirement allowance, for any cause other than disability, may become employed again with the former employer in a position as a coach of an athletics activity if: (1) the employment commences after the retirement allowance becomes due and payable; (2) the former member had attained the service retirement age, applicable to that member, as of the date of retirement; and (3) the compensation for the employment is less than $15,000 per year.  This subsection shall be effective if the qualified status of the retirement system under federal law can be maintained upon its application, and such modifications to the system as may be available shall be made to allow for its application.  As used in this section, "former employer" means the employer with which the former member held employment immediately prior to retirement. (cf: P.L.2021, c.296, s.1) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.